Oklahoma, session 2026, HB3130.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 2607.2 of Title 63, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. No state agency, subdivision, employee, contractor, or
public institution shall:
1. Provide, allocate, or reimburse any state funds for any
gender transition procedures, as defined in Section 2607.1 of this
title;
2. Facilitate, refer, or encourage the provision of such
procedures; and
3. Contract with any entity that knowingly performs or promotes
such procedures.
B. Any violation of this section by a state employee shall
constitute grounds for immediate termination and forfeiture of
public employment benefits.
SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 2607.3 of Title 63, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
HB3130 HFLR Page 2
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

A. A parent or guardian's decision to withhold consent for
gender transition procedures, as defined in Section 2607.1 of this
title or related social transitions shall not, in itself, constitute
abuse, neglect, or grounds for loss of custody.
B. Any government agency or court that violates this provision
shall be subject to civil liability and injunction.
SECTION 3. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 2607.4 of Title 63, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. If any provision of this act or its application is found
invalid by a court, the remaining provisions shall remain in full
force and effect.
B. Any challenge to this act shall be adjudicated exclusively
in the courts of the State of Oklahoma and shall be governed by
strict scrutiny standards applicable to state sovereign authority
over public health and child welfare.
SECTION 4. AMENDATORY 59 O.S. 2021, Section 509, as
amended by Section 2, Chapter 150, O.S.L. 2023 (59 O.S. Supp. 2025,
Section 509), is amended to read as follows:
Section 509. The words "unprofessional conduct" as used in
Sections 481 through 518.1 of this title are hereby declared to
include, but shall not be limited to, the following:
1. Procuring, aiding or abetting a criminal operation;

HB3130 HFLR Page 3
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

2. The obtaining of any fee or offering to accept any fee,
present or other form of remuneration whatsoever, on the assurance
or promise that a manifestly incurable disease can or will be cured;
3. Willfully betraying a professional secret to the detriment
of the patient;
4. Habitual intemperance or the habitual use of habit-forming
drugs;
5. Conviction or confession of, or plea of guilty, nolo
contendere, no contest or Alford plea to a felony or any offense
involving moral turpitude;
6. All advertising of medical business in which statements are
made which are grossly untrue or improbable and calculated to
mislead the public;
7. Conviction or confession of, or plea of guilty, nolo
contendere, no contest or Alford plea to a crime involving violation
of:
a. the antinarcotic or prohibition laws and regulations
of the federal government,
b. the laws of this state,
c. State Commissioner of Health rules, or
d. a determination by a judge or jury;
8. Dishonorable or immoral conduct which is likely to deceive,
defraud, or harm the public;

HB3130 HFLR Page 4
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

9. The commission of any act which is a violation of the
criminal laws of any state when such act is connected with the
physician's practice of medicine. A complaint, indictment or
confession of a criminal violation shall not be necessary for the
enforcement of this provision. Proof of the commission of the act
while in the practice of medicine or under the guise of the practice
of medicine shall be unprofessional conduct;
10. Failure to keep complete and accurate records of purchase
and disposal of controlled drugs or of narcotic drugs;
11. The writing of false or fictitious prescriptions for any
drugs or narcotics declared by the laws of this state to be
controlled or narcotic drugs;
12. Prescribing or administering a drug or treatment without
sufficient examination and the establishment of a valid physician-
patient relationship and not prescribing in a safe, medically
accepted manner;
13. The violation, or attempted violation, direct or indirect,
of any of the provisions of the Oklahoma Allopathic Medical and
Surgical Licensure and Supervision Act, either as a principal,
accessory or accomplice;
14. Aiding or abetting, directly or indirectly, the practice of
medicine by any person not duly authorized under the laws of this
state;

HB3130 HFLR Page 5
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

15. The inability to practice medicine with reasonable skill
and safety to patients by reason of age, illness, drunkenness,
excessive use of drugs, narcotics, chemicals, or any other type of
material or as a result of any mental or physical condition. In
enforcing this section the State Board of Medical Licensure and
Supervision may, upon probable cause, request a physician to submit
to a mental or physical examination by physicians designated by it.
If the physician refuses to submit to the examination, the Board
shall issue an order requiring the physician to show cause why the
physician will not submit to the examination and shall schedule a
hearing on the order within thirty (30) days after notice is served
on the physician, exclusive of the day of service. The physician
shall be notified by either personal service or by certified mail
with return receipt requested. At the hearing, the physician and
the physician's attorney are entitled to present any testimony and
other evidence to show why the physician should not be required to
submit to the examination. After a complete hearing, the Board
shall issue an order either requiring the physician to submit to the
examination or withdrawing the request for examination. The medical
license of a physician ordered to submit for examination may be
suspended until the results of the examination are received and
reviewed by the Board;


HB3130 HFLR Page 6
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

16. a. Prescribing, dispensing or administering of controlled
substances or narcotic drugs in excess of the amount
considered good medical practice,
b. Prescribing, dispensing or administering controlled
substances or narcotic drugs without medical need in
accordance with pertinent licensing board standards,
or
c. Prescribing, dispensing or administering opioid drugs
in excess of the maximum limits authorized in Section
2-309I of Title 63 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
17. Engaging in physical conduct with a patient which is sexual
in nature, or in any verbal behavior which is seductive or sexually
demeaning to a patient;
18. Failure to maintain an office record for each patient which
accurately reflects the evaluation, treatment, and medical necessity
of treatment of the patient;
19. Failure to provide necessary ongoing medical treatment when
a doctor-patient relationship has been established, which
relationship can be severed by either party providing a reasonable
period of time is granted;
20. Performance of an abortion as defined by Section 1-730 of
Title 63 of the Oklahoma Statutes, except for an abortion necessary
to prevent the death of the mother or to prevent substantial or
irreversible physical impairment of the mother that substantially
HB3130 HFLR Page 7
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

incr eases the risk of death. The performance of an abortion on the
basis of the mental or emotional health of the mother shall be a
violation of this paragraph, notwithstanding a claim or diagnosis
that the woman may engage in conduct which she intends to result in
her death. The Board shall impose a penalty as provided in Section
509.1 of this title on a licensee who violates this paragraph. The
penalty shall include, but not be limited to, suspension of the
license for a period not less than one (1) year;
21. Failure to provide a proper and safe medical facility
setting and qualified assistive personnel for a recognized medical
act, including but not limited to an initial in-person patient
examination, office surgery, diagnostic service or any other medical
procedure or treatment. Adequate medical records to support
diagnosis, procedure, treatment or prescribed medications must be
produced and maintained; or
22. Knowingly providing performing, attempting to perform, or
referring a child for a gender transition procedures procedure as
defined in Section 1 2607.1 of this act Title 63 of the Oklahoma
Statutes to a child.
SECTION 5. AMENDATORY Section 3, Chapter 150, O.S.L.
2023 (59 O.S. Supp. 2025, Section 519.12), is amended to read as
follows:
Section 519.12. Unprofessional conduct by a physician assistant
shall include, but not be limited to, knowingly providing
HB3130 HFLR Page 8
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

perf orming, attempting to perform, or referring a child for a gender
transition procedures procedure as defined in Section 1 2607.1 of
this act Title 63 of the Oklahoma Statutes to a child.
SECTION 6. AMENDATORY 59 O.S. 2021, Section 567.8, as
amended by Section 4, Chapter 150, O.S.L. 2023 (59 O.S. Supp. 2025,
Section 567.8), is amended to read as follows:
Section 567.8. A. The Oklahoma Board of Nursing shall have the
power to take any or all of the following actions:
1. To deny, revoke or suspend any:
a. licensure to practice as a Licensed Practical Nurse,
single-state or multistate,
b. licensure to practice as a Registered Nurse, single-
state or multistate,
c. multistate privilege to practice in Oklahoma,
d. licensure to practice as an Advanced Practice
Registered Nurse,
e. certification to practice as an Advanced Unlicensed
Assistant,
f. authorization for prescriptive authority, or
g. authority to order, select, obtain and administer
drugs;
2. To assess administrative penalties; and
3. To otherwise discipline applicants, licensees or Advanced
Unlicensed Assistants.
HB3130 HFLR Page 9
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

B. The Board shall impose a disciplinary action against the
person pursuant to the provisions of subsection A of this section
upon proof that the person:
1. Is guilty of deceit or material misrepresentation in
procuring or attempting to procure:
a. a license to practice registered nursing, licensed
practical nursing, or a license to practice advanced
practice registered nursing with or without either
prescriptive authority recognition or authorization to
order, select, obtain and administer drugs, or
b. certification as an Advanced Unlicensed Assistant;
2. Is guilty of a felony, or any offense substantially related
to the qualifications, functions or duties of any licensee or
Advanced Unlicensed Assistant, or any offense an essential element
of which is fraud, dishonesty, or an act of violence, whether or not
sentence is imposed, or any conduct resulting in the revocation of a
deferred or suspended sentence or probation imposed pursuant to such
conviction. For the purposes of this paragraph, "substantially
related" means the nature of criminal conduct for which the person
was convicted has a direct bearing on the fitness or ability to
perform one or more of the duties or responsibilities necessarily
related to the occupation;
3. Fails to adequately care for patients or to conform to the
minimum standards of acceptable nursing or Advanced Unlicensed
HB3130 HFLR Page 10
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

Assi stant practice that, in the opinion of the Board, unnecessarily
exposes a patient or other person to risk of harm;
4. Is intemperate in the use of alcohol or drugs, which use the
Board determines endangers or could endanger patients;
5. Exhibits through a pattern of practice or other behavior
actual or potential inability to practice nursing with sufficient
knowledge or reasonable skills and safety due to impairment caused
by illness, use of alcohol, drugs, chemicals or any other substance,
or as a result of any mental or physical condition, including
deterioration through the aging process or loss of motor skills,
mental illness, or disability that results in inability to practice
with reasonable judgment, skill or safety; provided, however, the
provisions of this paragraph shall not be utilized in a manner that
conflicts with the provisions of the Americans with Disabilities
Act;
6. Has been adjudicated as mentally incompetent, mentally ill,
chemically dependent or dangerous to the public or has been
committed by a court of competent jurisdiction, within or without
this state;
7. Is guilty of unprofessional conduct as defined in the rules
of the Board;
8. Is guilty of any act that jeopardizes a patient's life,
health or safety as defined in the rules of the Board;

HB3130 HFLR Page 11
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

9. Violated a rule promulgated by the Board, an order of the
Board, or a state or federal law relating to the practice of
registered, practical or advanced practice registered nursing or
advanced unlicensed assisting, or a state or federal narcotics or
controlled dangerous substance law including, but not limited to
prescribing, dispensing or administering opioid drugs in excess of
the maximum limits authorized in Section 2-309I of Title 63 of the
Oklahoma Statutes;
10. Has had disciplinary actions taken against the individual's
registered or practical nursing license, advanced unlicensed
assistive certification, or any professional or occupational
license, registration or certification in this or any state,
territory or country;
11. Has defaulted or been terminated from the peer assistance
program for any reason;
12. Fails to maintain professional boundaries with patients, as
defined in the Board rules;
13. Engages in sexual misconduct, as defined in Board rules,
with a current or former patient or key party, inside or outside the
health care setting; or
14. Has knowingly provided performed, attempted to perform, or
referred a child for a gender transition procedures procedure as
defined in Section 1 2607.1 of this act Title 63 of the Oklahoma
Statutes to a child.
HB3130 HFLR Page 12
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

C. Any person who supplies the Board information in good faith
shall not be liable in any way for damages with respect to giving
such information.
D. The Board may cause to be investigated all reported
violations of the Oklahoma Nursing Practice Act. Information
obtained during an investigation into possible violations of the
Oklahoma Nursing Practice Act shall be kept confidential, but may be
introduced by the state in administrative proceedings before the
Board, whereupon the information admitted becomes a public record.
Public records maintained by the agency are administrative records,
not public civil or criminal records.
Confidential investigative records shall not be subject to
discovery or subpoena in any civil or criminal proceeding, except
that the Board may give such information to law enforcement and
other state agencies as necessary and appropriate in the discharge
of the duties of that agency and only under circumstances that
ensure against unauthorized access to the information.
E. The Board may authorize the Executive Director to issue a
confidential letter of concern to a licensee when evidence does not
warrant formal proceedings, but the Executive Director has noted
indications of possible errant conduct that could lead to serious
consequences and formal action.
F. All individual proceedings before the Board shall be
conducted in accordance with the Administrative Procedures Act.
HB3130 HFLR Page 13
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

G. At a hearing the accused shall have the right to appear
either personally or by counsel, or both, to produce witnesses and
evidence on behalf of the accused, to cross-examine witnesses and to
have subpoenas issued by the designated Board staff. If the accused
is found guilty of the charges the Board may refuse to issue a
renewal of license to the applicant, revoke or suspend a license, or
otherwise discipline a licensee.
H. A person whose license is revoked may not apply for
reinstatement during the time period set by the Board. The Board on
its own motion may at any time reconsider its action.
I. Any person whose license is revoked or who applies for
renewal of registration and who is rejected by the Board shall have
the right to appeal from such action pursuant to the Administrative
Procedures Act.
J. 1. Any person who has been determined by the Board to have
violated any provisions of the Oklahoma Nursing Practice Act or any
rule or order issued pursuant thereto shall be liable for an
administrative penalty not to exceed Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00)
for each count for which any holder of a certificate or license has
been determined to be in violation of the Oklahoma Nursing Practice
Act or any rule promulgated or order issued pursuant thereto.
2. The amount of the penalty shall be assessed by the Board
pursuant to the provisions of this section, after notice and an
opportunity for hearing is given to the accused. In determining the
HB3130 HFLR Page 14
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

amou nt of the penalty, the Board shall include, but not be limited
to, consideration of the nature, circumstances, and gravity of the
violation and, with respect to the person found to have committed
the violation, the degree of culpability, the effect on ability of
the person to continue to practice, and any show of good faith in
attempting to achieve compliance with the provisions of the Oklahoma
Nursing Practice Act.
K. The Board shall retain jurisdiction over any person issued a
license, certificate or temporary license pursuant to the Oklahoma
Nursing Practice Act, regardless of whether the license, certificate
or temporary license has expired, lapsed or been relinquished during
or after the alleged occurrence or conduct prescribed by the
Oklahoma Nursing Practice Act.
L. In the event disciplinary action is imposed, any person so
disciplined shall be responsible for any and all costs associated
with satisfaction of the discipline imposed.
M. In the event disciplinary action is imposed in an
administrative proceeding, the Board shall have the authority to
recover the monies expended by the Board in pursuing any
disciplinary action, including but not limited to costs of
investigation, probation or monitoring fees, administrative costs,
witness fees, attorney fees and court costs. This authority shall
be in addition to the Board's authority to impose discipline as set
out in subsection A of this section.
HB3130 HFLR Page 15
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

N. The Executive Director shall immediately suspend the license
of any person upon proof that the person has been sentenced to a
period of continuous incarceration serving a penal sentence for
commission of a misdemeanor or felony. The suspension shall remain
in effect until the Board acts upon the licensee's written
application for reinstatement of the license.
O. When a majority of the officers of the Board, which
constitutes the President, Vice President and Secretary/Treasurer,
find that preservation of the public health, safety or welfare
requires immediate action, summary suspension of licensure or
certification may be ordered before the filing of a sworn complaint
or at any other time before the outcome of an individual proceeding.
The summary suspension of licensure or certification may be ordered
without compliance with the requirements of the Oklahoma Open
Meeting Act. Within seven (7) days after the summary suspension,
the licensee shall be notified by letter that summary suspension has
occurred. The summary suspension letter shall include notice of the
date of the proposed hearing to be held in accordance with Section
485:10-11-2 of the Oklahoma Administrative Code and the
Administrative Procedures Act, within ninety (90) days of the date
of the summary suspension letter, and shall be signed by one of the
Board officers.
P. In any proceeding in which the Board is required to serve an
order on an individual, the Board may send such material to the
HB3130 HFLR Page 16
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

indi vidual's address of record with the Board. If the order is
returned with a notation by the United States Postal Service
indicating that it is undeliverable for any reason, and the records
of the Board indicate that the Board has not received any change of
address since the order was sent, as required by the rules of the
Board, the order and any subsequent material relating to the same
matter sent to the most recent address on file with the Board shall
be deemed by the court as having been legally served for all
purposes.
SECTION 7. AMENDATORY 59 O.S. 2021, Section 637, as
amended by Section 14, Chapter 168, O.S.L. 2025 (59 O.S. Supp. 2025,
Section 637), is amended to read as follows:
Section 637. A. The State Board of Osteopathic Examiners may
institute disciplinary action, enforce sanctions, or refuse to admit
a person to an examination or may refuse to issue or reinstate or
may suspend or revoke any license issued or reinstated by the Board
upon proof that the applicant or holder of such a license:
1. Has obtained a license, license renewal or authorization to
sit for an examination, as the case may be, through fraud,
deception, misrepresentation or bribery; or has been granted a
license, license renewal or authorization to sit for an examination
based upon a material mistake of fact;
2. Has engaged in the use or employment of dishonesty, fraud,
misrepresentation, false promise, false pretense, unethical conduct
HB3130 HFLR Page 17
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

or u nprofessional conduct, as may be determined by the Board, in the
performance of the functions or duties of an osteopathic physician
including, but not limited to, the following:
a. obtaining or attempting to obtain any fee, charge,
tuition or other compensation by fraud, deception or
misrepresentation; willfully and continually
overcharging or overtreating patients; or charging for
visits to the physician’s office which did not occur
or for services which were not rendered,
b. using intimidation, coercion or deception to obtain or
retain a patient or discourage the use of a second
opinion or consultation,
c. willfully performing inappropriate or unnecessary
treatment, diagnostic tests or osteopathic medical or
surgical services,
d. delegating professional responsibilities to a person
who is not qualified by training, skill, competency,
age, experience or licensure to perform them, noting
that delegation may only occur within an appropriate
physician-patient relationship, wherein a proper
patient record is maintained including, but not
limited to, at the minimum, a current history and
physical,

HB3130 HFLR Page 18
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

e. misrepresenting that any disease, ailment, or
infirmity can be cured by a method, procedure,
treatment, medicine or device,
f. acting in a manner which results in final disciplinary
action by any professional society or association or
hospital or medical staff of such hospital in this or
any other state, whether agreed to voluntarily or not,
if the action was in any way related to professional
conduct, professional competence, malpractice or any
other violation of the Oklahoma Osteopathic Medicine
Act,
g. signing a blank prescription form; or dispensing,
prescribing, administering or otherwise distributing
any drug, controlled substance or other treatment
without sufficient examination or the establishment of
a physician-patient relationship, or for other than
medically accepted therapeutic or experimental or
investigational purpose duly authorized by a state or
federal agency, or not in good faith to relieve pain
and suffering, or not to treat an ailment, physical
infirmity or disease, or violating any state or
federal law on controlled dangerous substances
including, but not limited to, prescribing, dispensing
or administering opioid drugs in excess of the maximum
HB3130 HFLR Page 19
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

limits authorized in Section 2-309I of Title 63 of the
Oklahoma Statutes,
h. engaging in any sexual activity within a physician-
patient relationship,
i. terminating the care of a patient without adequate
notice or without making other arrangements for the
continued care of the patient,
j. failing to furnish a copy of a patient’s medical
records upon a proper request from the patient or
legal agent of the patient or another physician; or
failing to comply with any other law relating to
medical records,
k. failing to comply with any subpoena issued by the
Board,
l. violating a probation agreement with or order from
this Board or any other agency, and
m. failing to keep complete and accurate records of
purchase and disposal of controlled drugs or narcotic
drugs;
3. Has engaged in gross negligence, gross malpractice or gross
incompetence;
4. Has engaged in repeated acts of negligence, malpractice or
incompetence;

HB3130 HFLR Page 20
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

5. Has been finally adjudicated and found guilty, or entered a
plea of guilty or nolo contendere in a criminal prosecution, for any
offense reasonably related to the qualifications, functions or
duties of an osteopathic physician, whether or not a sentence is
imposed, and regardless of the pendency of an appeal;
6. Has had the authority to engage in the activities regulated
by the Board revoked, suspended, restricted, modified or limited, or
has been reprimanded, warned or censured, probated or otherwise
disciplined by any other state or federal agency whether or not
voluntarily agreed to by the physician including, but not limited
to, the denial of licensure, surrender of the license, permit or
authority, allowing the license, permit or authority to expire or
lapse, or discontinuing or limiting the practice of osteopathic
medicine pending disposition of a complaint or completion of an
investigation;
7. Has violated or failed to comply with provisions of any act
or regulation administered by the Board;
8. Is incapable, for medical or psychiatric or any other good
cause, of discharging the functions of an osteopathic physician in a
manner consistent with the public’s health, safety and welfare;
9. Has been guilty of advertising by means of knowingly false
or deceptive statements;
10. Has been guilty of advertising, practicing, or attempting
to practice under a name other than one’s own;
HB3130 HFLR Page 21
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

11. Has violated or refused to comply with a lawful order of
the Board;
12. Has been guilty of habitual drunkenness, or habitual
addiction to the use of morphine, cocaine or other habit-forming
drugs;
13. Has been guilty of personal offensive behavior, which would
include, but not be limited to, obscenity, lewdness, and
molestation;
14. Has performed an abortion as defined by Section 1-730 of
Title 63 of the Oklahoma Statutes, except for an abortion necessary
to prevent the death of the mother or to prevent substantial or
irreversible physical impairment of the mother that substantially
increases the risk of death. The performance of an abortion on the
basis of the mental or emotional health of the mother shall be a
violation of this paragraph, notwithstanding a claim or diagnosis
that the woman may engage in conduct which she intends to result in
her death. The Board shall impose a penalty as provided in this
section and in Section 637.1 of this title on a licensee who
violates this paragraph. The penalty shall include, but not be
limited to, suspension of the license for a period not less than one
(1) year;
15. Has been adjudicated to be insane, or incompetent, or
admitted to an institution for the treatment of psychiatric
disorders;
HB3130 HFLR Page 22
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

16. Has knowingly provided performed, attempted to perform, or
referred a child for a gender transition procedures procedure as
defined in Section 2607.1 of Title 63 of the Oklahoma Statutes to a
child;
17. Has violated any of the provisions of the Oklahoma Pharmacy
Act, which shall be punishable by appropriate actions established in
rules promulgated by the Board; or
18. Has breached the American Osteopathic Association Code of
Ethics or the Osteopathic Oath.
B. The Board may enter an order denying licensure or imposing
any of the penalties as prescribed by rule against any applicant for
licensure or licensee who is found guilty of violating any provision
of subsection A of this section. In determining what action is
appropriate, the Board shall first consider what sanctions are
necessary to protect the public or to compensate the patient. Only
after those sanctions have been imposed may the Board consider and
include in the order requirements designed to rehabilitate the
physician. All costs associated with compliance with orders issued
under this subsection shall be the obligation of the physician.
C. In any administrative action against a physician that does
not involve revocation or suspension of a license, the Board shall
have the burden, by the greater weight of the evidence, to establish
the existence of grounds for disciplinary action. The Board shall

HB3130 HFLR Page 23
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

esta blish grounds for revocation or suspension of a license by clear
and convincing evidence.
D. The Board shall not reinstate the license or certificate of
an osteopathic physician, or cause a license or certificate to be
issued to a person it has deemed unqualified, until such time as it
is satisfied that he or she has complied with all the terms and
conditions set forth in the final order and that such person is
capable of safely engaging in the practice of osteopathic medicine.
However, the Board shall not issue a license to, or reinstate the
license of, any osteopathic physician found by the Board to have
committed repeated medical malpractice, regardless of the extent to
which the licensee or prospective licensee has complied with all
terms and conditions set forth in the final order or is capable of
safely engaging in the practice of osteopathic medicine.
E. The State Board of Osteopathic Examiners shall neither
refuse to renew, nor suspend, nor revoke any license, however, for
any of these causes, unless the person accused has been given at
least twenty (20) days’ notice in writing of the charge against him
or her and a public hearing by the Board; provided, three-fourths
(3/4) of a quorum present at a meeting may vote to suspend a license
in an emergency situation if the licensee affected is provided a
public hearing within thirty (30) days of the emergency suspension.
F. The State Board of Osteopathic Examiners shall have the
power to order or subpoena the attendance of witnesses, the
HB3130 HFLR Page 24
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

insp ection of records and premises and the production of relevant
books and papers for the investigation of matters that may come
before it. The presiding officer of the Board or his or her
designee shall have the authority to compel the giving of testimony
as is conferred on courts of justice.
G. Any osteopathic physician in this state whose license to
practice osteopathic medicine is revoked or suspended under this
section shall have the right to seek judicial review of a ruling of
the Board pursuant to the Administrative Procedures Act.
H. The Board may enact rules necessary or appropriate to the
performance, enforcement, or carrying out of any of the purposes,
objectives, or provisions of this section.
SECTION 8. AMENDATORY Section 1, Chapter 150, O.S.L.
2023 (63 O.S. Supp. 2025, Section 2607.1), is amended to read as
follows:
Section 2607.1. A. As used in this section:
1. "Child" or "minor" means any person under eighteen (18)
years of age;
2. a. "Gender transition procedures" means the following
medical or surgical services performed for the purpose
of attempting to affirm the minor's perception of his
or her gender or biological sex, if that perception is
inconsistent with the minor's biological sex:

HB3130 HFLR Page 25
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

(1) surgical procedures that alter or remove physical
or anatomical characteristics or features that
are typical for the individual's biological sex,
including, but not limited to, genital or chest
surgeries, or
(2) puberty-blocking drugs, cross-sex hormones, or
other drugs to suppress or delay normal puberty
or to promote the development of feminizing or
masculinizing features consistent with the
opposite biological sex.
b. Gender transition procedures do not include:
(1) behavioral health care services or mental health
counseling,
(2) medications to treat depression and anxiety,
(3) medications prescribed, dispensed, or
administered specifically for the purpose of
treating precocious puberty or delayed puberty in
that patient,
(4) services provided to individuals born with
ambiguous genitalia, incomplete genitalia, or
both male and female anatomy, or biochemically
verifiable disorder of sex development (DSD),
including but not limited to:
(a) 46,XX DSD,
HB3130 HFLR Page 26
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

(b) 46,XY DSD,
(c) sex chromosomes DSDs,
(d) XX or XY sex reversal, and
(e) ovotesticular disorder,
(5) the treatment of any infection, injury, disease,
or disorder that has been caused by or
exacerbated by the performance of gender
transition procedures, whether or not the gender
transition procedure was performed in accordance
with state and federal law,
(6) the treatment of any physical injury or illness
that would, as certified by a physician, place
the individual in imminent danger of death or
impairment of a major bodily function unless such
treatment is performed, or
(7) the provision of puberty-blocking drugs or cross-
sex hormones to a minor currently receiving such
drugs or hormones as of the effective date of
this act for a period of not more than six (6)
months solely for the purpose of assisting the
minor with gradually decreasing and discontinuing
use of the drugs or hormones.;
3. "Health care provider" means a physician, physician
assistant, Advanced Practice Registered Nurse, or any other person
HB3130 HFLR Page 27
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

who is licensed, certified, or otherwise authorized by the laws of
this state to administer health care in the ordinary course of the
practice of his or her profession; and
4. "State funds" includes funds appropriated by the Legislature
or derived from any Oklahoma government agency or political
subdivision.
B. A health care provider shall not knowingly provide perform,
attempt to perform, or refer a child for a gender transition
procedures to any child procedure.
C. No person shall knowingly aid or abet the performance or
referral of a gender transition procedure on a child, whether in-
state or out-of-state.
C. D. A health care provider found in violation of subsection B
of this section shall, upon an adverse ruling by the provider's
respective licensing board, be guilty of unprofessional conduct.
Disciplinary proceedings against the health care provider may be
commenced at any time after the commission of such offense.
D. E. A health care provider who violates subsection B of this
section shall, upon conviction, be guilty of a felony. Prosecution
for a criminal violation of subsection B of this section shall be
commenced not later than the date on which the child attains the age
of forty-five (45) years.
E. F. 1. The parent, legal guardian, or next friend of a child
to whom a health care provider has provided one or more gender
HB3130 HFLR Page 28
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

tran sition procedures in violation of subsection B of this section
may bring a civil action against the health care provider. The
parent, legal guardian, or next friend shall bring a claim for the
violation no later than the date on which the child attains the age
of majority.
2. A child to whom a health care provider has provided one or
more gender transition procedures may bring an action throughout his
or her minority through a parent, legal guardian, or next friend,
and may bring an action in his or her own name upon reaching
majority at any time until the date on which the child attains the
age of forty-five (45) years.
3. The court in such action may award compensatory damages,
punitive damages, injunctive relief, or any other appropriate
relief. Additionally, the court shall award court costs and
reasonable attorney fees to a prevailing party who establishes a
violation of this section.
4. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, an action under
this subsection may be commenced, and relief may be granted, in a
judicial proceeding without regard to whether the person commencing
the action has sought or exhausted available administrative
remedies.
F. G. The Attorney General may bring an action to enforce
compliance with this act. Nothing in this act shall be construed to
deny, impair, or otherwise affect any right or authority of the
HB3130 HFLR Page 29
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

Atto rney General, the state, or an agency, officer, or employee of
the state to institute or intervene in any action or proceeding.
SECTION 9. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.

COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON GOVERNMENT OVERSIGHT, dated
03/02/2026 - DO PASS, As Amended and Coauthored.
















HB3130 HFLR Page 30
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.